Utah statutes.
70A-9a-317.   Interests that take priority over or take free of security
interest or agricultural lien.
(1)  A security interest or agricultural lien is subordinate to the rights of:
(a)  a person entitled to priority under Section 70A-9a-322; and
(b)  except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), a person that becomes a
lien creditor before the earlier of the time:
(i)  the security interest or agricultural lien is perfected; or
(ii)  one of the conditions specified in Subsection 70A-9a-203(2)(c) is met
and a financing statement covering the collateral is filed.
(2)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), a buyer, other than a
secured party, of tangible chattel paper, tangible documents, goods,
instruments, or a security certificate takes free of a security interest or
agricultural lien if the buyer gives value and receives delivery of the
collateral without knowledge of the security interest or agricultural lien and
before it is perfected.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (5), a lessee of goods takes
free of a security interest or agricultural lien if the lessee gives value and
receives delivery of the collateral without knowledge of the security interest
or agricultural lien and before it is perfected.
(4)  A licensee of a general intangible or a buyer, other than a secured
party, of accounts, electronic chattel paper, electronic documents, general
intangibles, or investment property other than a certificated security takes
free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives value without
knowledge of the security interest and before it is perfected.
(5)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 70A-9a-320 and 70A-9a-321, if a
person files a financing statement with respect to a purchase-money security
interest before or within 20 days after the debtor receives delivery of the
collateral, the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer,
lessee, or lien creditor which arise between the time the security interest
attaches and the time of filing.
